Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.089

Child molestation in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of child molestation in the third degree when the person has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another who is at least fourteen years old but less than sixteen years old and the perpetrator is at least forty-eight months older than the victim.

(2) Child molestation in the third degree is a class C felony.

[ 2021 c 142 s 7; 1994 c 271 s 305; 1988 c 145 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 142: See note following RCW 9A.44.050.

Intent—1994 c 271: See note following RCW 9A.44.010.

Purpose—Severability—1994 c 271: See notes following RCW 9A.28.020.

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.